hu: Készítmény erőssége: Extra erős; Maximális erősségű; Normál; Egyéb
sl-SI: Moč formulacije: Ekstra močna; Maksimalna moč; Običajna; Drugo
de: Formulierungsstärke: Extra stark; Maximale Stärke; Normal; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Сила на формулата: Екстра сила; Максимална сила; Обикновена; Други
ko: 제형 강도: 엑스트라 스트렝스; 최대 강도; 레귤러; 기타
zh-CN: 配方强度: 超强型; 最大强度; 常规; 其他
fi: Kaavan vahvuus: Ekstra vahva; Maksimivahvuus; Tavallinen; Muu
es: Fuerza de la formulación: Fuerza extra; Fuerza máxima; Regular; Otros
sv: Formuleringsstyrka: Extra stark; Maximal styrka; Vanligt; Övrigt
tr: Formülasyon gücü: Ekstra güçlü; Maksimum güç; Normal; Diğer
ro-RO: Concentrația formulei: Extra-puternic; Putere maximă; Normală; Altele
vi: Độ mạnh công thức: Siêu mạnh; Độ mạnh tối đa; Thường; Khác
cs: Síla složení: Extra silná; Maximální síla; Běžná; Jiné
pl: Siła działania formuły: Ekstra mocny; Maksymalna siła; Zwyczajna; Inne
pt-BR: Força da formulação: Extra forte; Força máxima; Regular; Outro
nb: Formuleringsstyrke: Ekstra styrke; Maksimal styrke; Vanlig; Annet
fr: Concentration de la formulation: Force extra; Force maximale; Normal; Autre
zh-TW: 配方強度: 加強型; 最高強度; 一般; 其他
lt-LT: Formulės stiprumas: Ypač stipri; Maksimalus stiprumas; Įprasti; Kita
th: ความแรงของสูตร: ความแรงพิเศษ; ความแรงสูงสุด; ธรรมดา; อื่นๆ
nl: Formuleringssterkte: Extra sterk; Maximale sterkte; Normaal; Andere
ru: Сила формулы: Экстра сильный; Максимальная сила; Обычные; Другой
en: Formulation strength: Extra strength; Maximum strength; Regular; Other
el: Ισχύς σύνθεσης: Έξτρα δύναμη; Μέγιστη ισχύς; Κανονική; Άλλο
da: Formuleringsstyrke: Ekstra styrke; Maksimal styrke; Almindelig; Andet
ja: 配合強度: エクストラストレングス; 最大強度; レギュラー; その他
hr-HR: Jačina formulacije: Ekstra jaka; Maksimalna jačina; Regularni; Ostalo
it: Forza della formulazione: Extra forte; Forza massima; Regular; Altro
sk-SK: Sila zloženia: Extra silná; Maximálna sila; Bežný; Iné
pt-PT: Potência da formulação: Força extra; Força máxima; Normal; Outro